sq_AL.aff
# GPLv3 License
#
# Copyright (c) 2026, by Besmir Godolja
#
# E-mail: bgodole@gmail.com
# Version 1.0 (11.02.2020)
# Version 1.1 (13.01.2022)
# Version 1.2 (27.03.2026)
#
# This file is part of the Albanian spell checker.
#
# The Albanian spell checker is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published
# by the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.
#
# The Albanian spell checker is distributed in the hope that it will be
# useful, but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License along with
# the Albanian spell checker. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

SET UTF-8
FLAG long
FULLSTRIP
WORDCHARS -.'
TRY aiersthnëolukmjpdgvbzfcçqyx

# FOLJET

SFX A1 Y 38
SFX A1 ah ihni ah po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl2
SFX A1 al ilni al po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl2
SFX A1 am em am po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg1
SFX A1 am esh am po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg2
SFX A1 am etë am po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A1 am emi am po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl1
SFX A1 am eni am po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl2
SFX A1 am enë am po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3
SFX A1 et asë [^d][hr]et po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A1 et asin [^d][hr]et po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3
SFX A1 ë ini ë po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl2
SFX A1 ëlcas lasësh cas po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg2
SFX A1 ëlcas lasë cas po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A1 ëlcas lasim cas po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl1
SFX A1 ëlcas lasni cas po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl2
SFX A1 ëlcas lasin cas po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3
SFX A1 i ë [ckp]i po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A1 i ësh [ckp]i po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg2
SFX A1 idhet edhë dhet po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A1 idhet edhin dhet po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3
SFX A1 ie jerë ie po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A1 e ni ie po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl2
SFX A1 igjet jegë gjet po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A1 igjet jegin gjet po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3
SFX A1 iqet jekë qet po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A1 iqet jekin qet po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3
SFX A1 izet ezë zet po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A1 izet ezin zet po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3
SFX A1 j sh j po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg2
SFX A1 n jë n po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A1 n jnë n po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3
SFX A1 te ja ete po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg1
SFX A1 te sh ete po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg2
SFX A1 te jë ete po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A1 te më ete po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl1
SFX A1 te ni ete po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl2
SFX A1 te në ete po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3
SFX A1 ua ojë ua po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3

SFX A2 Y 2
SFX A2 0 ësh [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg2
SFX A2 0 sh [aeëi] po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg2

SFX A3 Y 2
SFX A3 0 im [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl1
SFX A3 0 më [aëi] po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl1

SFX A4 Y 2
SFX A4 0 in [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3
SFX A4 0 në [ëi] po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3

SFX A5 Y 5
SFX A5 0 ë [^aeëi] po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A5 0 jë [^i][aei] po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3
SFX A5 0 m ie po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl1
SFX A5 0 n ie po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl3
SFX A5 0 rë ë po:verb is:v_dfar is:sg3

SFX A6 Y 1
SFX A6 0 ni [abcçdfghijklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:v_dfar is:pl2

SFX A7 Y 56
SFX A7 0 ë [lr] po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 0 a [lr] po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 0 ët [lr] po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 0 i [lr] po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 0 në ë po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 0 na ë po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 0 nët ë po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 0 ni ë po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 0 rë [p]i po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 0 ra [p]i po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 0 rët [p]i po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 0 ri [p]i po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 0 tur [^p][ij] po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 0 tura [^p][ij] po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 0 turi [^p][ij] po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 0 turit [^p][ij] po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 em ur em po:verb is:j_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 em ura em po:verb is:j_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 em uri em po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 em urit em po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 ie urë ie po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 ie ura ie po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 ie urët ie po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 ie uri ie po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 in uar rrin po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 in uara rrin po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 in uari rrin po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 in uarit rrin po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 en yer en po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 en yera en po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 en yeri en po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 en yerit en po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 as itur as po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 as itura as po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 as ituri as po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 as iturit as po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 het rë het po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 het ra het po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 het rët het po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 het ri het po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 et ë rret po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 et a rret po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 et ët rret po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 et i rret po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 kam pasur kam po:verb is:j_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 kam pasura kam po:verb is:j_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 kam pasuri kam po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 kam pasurit kam po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 illet jellë llet po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 illet jella llet po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 illet jellët llet po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 illet jelli llet po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 s kur es po:verb is:v_dfkr is:mas
SFX A7 s kura es po:verb is:v_dfkr is:fem
SFX A7 s kuri es po:noun po:asnj
SFX A7 s kurit es po:noun po:asnj
